Utah statutes.
76-9-704.   Abuse or desecration of a dead human body -- Penalties.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "dead human body" includes any part of a human body in any stage of decomposition, including ancient human remains as defined in Section 9-8-302.

(2)  A person is guilty of abuse or desecration of a dead human body if the person intentionally and unlawfully:

(a)  fails to report the finding of a dead human body to a local law enforcement agency;

(b)  disturbs, moves, removes, conceals, or destroys a dead human body or any part of it;

(c)  disinters a buried or otherwise interred dead human body, without authority of a court order;

(d)  dismembers a dead human body to any extent, or damages or detaches any part or portion of a dead human body; or

(e) (i)  commits or attempts to commit upon any dead human body any act of sexual penetration, regardless of the sex of the actor and of the dead human body; and

(ii)  as used in Subsection (2)(e)(i), "sexual penetration" means penetration, however slight, of the genital or anal opening by any object, substance, instrument, or device, including a part of the human body, or penetration involving the genitals of the actor and the mouth of the dead human body.

(3)  A person does not violate this section if when that person directs or carries out procedures regarding a dead human body, that person complies with:

(a)  Title 9, Chapter 8, Part 3, Antiquities;

(b)  Title 26, Chapter 4, Utah Medical Examiner Act;

(c)  Title 26, Chapter 28, Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act;

(d)  Title 53B, Chapter 17, Part 3, Use of Dead Bodies for Medical Purposes;

(e)  Title 58, Chapter 9, Funeral Services Licensing Act; or

(f)  Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, which concerns licensing to practice medicine.

(4) (a)  Failure to report the finding of a dead human body as required under Subsection (2)(a) is a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  Abuse or desecration of a dead human body as described in Subsections (2)(b) through (e) is a third degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 60, 2007 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 231, 2007 General Session

